Ohio, session 136, HB607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.856 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.856. In addition to any other name prescribed by the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number ninety-four, in the municipal corporation of Parma in Cuyahoga county, shall be known as the "Specialist Fourth Class Frank A. Herda, Medal of Honor Recipient, Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.